Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6733
Reapplication authorized; lifting of sanctions.

A person whose registration has been denied, refused renewal, or removed from the Medication Aide Registry may reapply for registration or for lifting of the disciplinary sanction at any time after one year has elapsed since the date such registration was denied, refused renewal, or removed from the registry, in accordance with the rules and regulations.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 23;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 45.